Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-968
Bonds; issuance; record.

If a majority of the votes cast at an election called under section 17-967 are in favor of the proposition, the city council or village board of trustees shall cause to be prepared and shall issue the bonds in accordance with the petition and notice of election. The bonds shall be signed by the mayor and city clerk or chairperson of the village board of trustees and village clerk and shall be attested by the respective seals. The city clerk or village clerk shall enter upon the records of the city council or village board of trustees, the petition, bond, notice, and call for the election, canvass of the vote, the number, amount, and interest, and the date at which each bond issued shall become payable.

Laws 1967, c. 33, § 4, p. 156;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 18;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 299.